Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Article 1. Liability of Towns for Damages

§ 985.
Injuries from defective bridges and culverts.

If damage occurs to a person, or his or her property, by reason of the insufficiency or want of repair of a bridge or culvert that the town is liable to keep in repair, the person sustaining damage may recover in a civil action. If the damage accrues in consequence of the insufficiency or want of repair of a bridge erected and maintained by two or more towns, the action shall be brought against all the towns liable for the repairs. The damage and costs shall be paid by the towns in the proportions in which they are liable for the repairs. The court may issue execution against any or all towns for their proportion only, provided that the liability to any town shall not exceed $75,000.00 or, where insurance is carried, the maximum policy liability limits, whichever sum is greater, on account of injury to or death of a person and damage to his or her property.

Towns and other corporations shall not be liable for damage to a person or his or her property by reason of the insufficiency or want of repair of a bridge or culvert while traveling on the highway or bridge in violation of the provisions of Title 23 regarding motor vehicle use.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 986.
When one town is out of State.

When the damage mentioned in section 985 of this title accrues in consequence of the insufficiency or want of repair of a bridge built and maintained by two or more towns, one or more of which are out of this State, the action shall be brought against the town or towns within this State liable for repairs.
The proportion of the damage with costs shall be paid by the town or towns in the proportion in which it or they are liable for the repairs.
The court may issue execution as provided in section 985 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 987.
Extent of liability; notice required.

A person shall not recover against a town or other corporation for any damage sustained when crossing a bridge or culvert with a vehicle with a total gross weight exceeding the legal or posted weight limits.
An action shall not be had or maintained in any court against a town for injuries received or damages sustained through the insufficiency of a bridge or culvert, unless notice is first given in writing, signed by the injured party or the party claiming damage, to one or more selectboard members of the town in which the bridge or culvert is situated, within 20 days of the time of the occurrence of the injury or damage, stating the time when and the place where the injury was received, and pointing out in what respect the bridge or culvert was insufficient or out of repair, and stating that the person will claim satisfaction of the town.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

Particular cases.

Plaintiff’s notice was adequate to alert the town that a bridge was dangerous and inform it of a pending claim, thereby allowing the town to begin investigation where, nine days after the accident, plaintiff sent a letter notifying the town of the location of the bridge where the accident occurred and the date of the accident, and the letter informed the town that
plaintiff had suffered personal injuries along with property damage and that he was making a claim for his damages. Lane v. Town of Grafton, 166 Vt. 148, 689 A.2d 455, 1997 Vt. LEXIS 1 (1997).

Parties to whom notice to be given.

The notice required could be accomplished by service on the selectmen of the town within the period prescribed. Thompson v. Town of Stannard, 125 Vt. 140, 211 A.2d 253, 1965 Vt. LEXIS 213 (1965).

Notice of injury to all towns in which a bridge was situated was sufficient to bind all. Tyler v. Williston, 62 Vt. 269, 20 A. 304, 1890 Vt. LEXIS 112 (1890).

If notice of an injury and a claim for damages was not given to all of the towns in which a bridge was situated, none were liable. Brown v. Town of Fair Haven, 47 Vt. 386, 1875 Vt. LEXIS 32 (1875).

§ 988.
Contents of notice.

The notice shall contain a description of the injury received or damage sustained.
If bodily injuries are claimed, the part of the body injured shall be stated, with the extent and effect of the injury upon the health of the person injured, but the provisions in relation to notice shall not apply to a person who in consequence is lacking mental capacity.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

Particular cases.

Plaintiff’s notice was adequate to alert the town that a bridge was dangerous and inform it of a pending claim, thereby allowing the town to begin investigation where, nine days after the accident, plaintiff sent a letter notifying the town of the location of the bridge where the accident occurred and the date of the accident, and the letter informed the town that
plaintiff had suffered personal injuries along with property damage and that he was making a claim for his damages. Lane v. Town of Grafton, 166 Vt. 148, 689 A.2d 455, 1997 Vt. LEXIS 1 (1997).